Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SHORT TITLE.new text end new text begin This act may be cited as "Harvey's Law." new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 142B.68, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Applicability. new text begin (a) new text end Beginning July 1, 2026, a licensed child care center must have video security cameras in public and shared areas of its facility as provided under subdivision 3 and comply with the requirements of this section if the center is required to post a maltreatment investigation memorandum under section 142B.16, subdivision 5, or 142B.18, subdivision 6. A center must comply with the requirements under this section within six months of when the maltreatment investigation memorandum is posted and must maintain compliance for four years after the memorandum is required to be posted. new text begin (b) Beginning July 1, 2027, a licensed child care center that received child care assistance program funds under chapter 142E, great start compensation support payments under section 142D.21, early learning scholarships under section 142D.25, or a combination thereof in the previous calendar year must have video security cameras in public and shared areas of its facility as provided under subdivision 3 and comply with the requirements of this section. new text end